Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-707
Simultaneous proceedings; how treated.

Any proceeding involving a guardianship, conservatorship, power of attorney for health care decisions, or power of attorney granted by the resident may continue in the trial court while an appeal is pending from an order granted under sections 30-701 to 30-713.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 7.